District of Columbia statutes.
1-154

Use of donations and grants for flag replacement.

The Mayor is authorized to solicit, receive, accept, and expend donations or grants from private sources to defray the costs of replacing existing District of Columbia flags with flags that include the language prescribed in § 1-152(a).

History

Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-237, § 5, 49 DCR 10485

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-174.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-174.